Washington statutes.
RCW 35.30.040

Limitation of indebtedness.

Whenever it is deemed advisable to do so by the city council thereof, any city having a corporate existence in this state at the time of the adoption of the Constitution thereof is hereby authorized and empowered to borrow money and to contract indebtedness in any other manner for general municipal purposes, not exceeding in amount, together with the existing general indebtedness of the city, the amount of indebtedness authorized by chapter 39.36 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, to be incurred without the assent of the voters.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.30.040. Prior: 1890 p 225 s 1; RRS s 9532.]

NOTES:

Construction—1890 p 227: "That when this act comes in conflict with any provision, limitation or restriction in any local or special law or charter existing at the time that the Constitution of the State of Washington was adopted, this statute shall govern and control." [ 1890 p 227 s 6.] This applies to RCW 35.30.040 through 35.30.060.

Limitations upon indebtedness: State Constitution Art. 7 s 2 (Amendments 55, 59), Art. 8 s 6 (Amendment 27), chapter 39.36 RCW, RCW 84.52.050.